Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
Article 5 Fair and Open Grants

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993’. ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Grant programs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Grants of Council of Juvenile Court Judges of Georgia, Chapter 132-1.

Qualification of grants, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Energy Resources, Grants, Subject 187-4-1.

Institutional conversation program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Energy Resources, Grants, Subject 187-4-3.

Local government/non-profit energy conversation grant program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Energy Resources, Grants, Subject 187-4-4.

Low income weatherization assistance program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Energy Resources, Grants, Subject 187-4-6.

Low income weatherization assistance integrated resource plan program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Energy Resources, Grants, Subject 187-4-7.

Low income weatherization assistance program (Georgia Power Company’s Integrated Resource Plan - Low Income Plan), Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Energy Resources, Grants, Subject 187-4-8.

Institutional conversation program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Grant Program Description for Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority, Chapter 267-5.

No-Tillage Assistance Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Grant Program Description for Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority, Chapter 267-16.

Grant descriptions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Bright from the Start Georgia Department of Early Care and Learning, Subject 591-2-1.

28-5-120.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Fair and Open Grants Act of 1993.”

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 20.

28-5-121.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Grant” means any line item appropriation of funds that will be disbursed for a public purpose of which such amount, purpose, and recipient is not identified in the appropriations Act. For the purposes of this Code section, “grant” shall not include:

Disbursements made pursuant to the Quality Basic Education formula;

Disbursements made pursuant to the board of regents funding formula;

Any grant, by law, which is apportioned entirely by formula;

Common object classes excluding per diem, fees, and contracts;

Disbursements made through the Governor’s Emergency Fund; or

Any disbursements made pursuant to an emergency.

“State agency” means any department, agency, bureau, commission, or like unit of organization of state government and any state authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 20.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “appropriations Act” was substituted for “Appropriation Act” in the first sentence in paragraph (1).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “appropriations” was substituted for “appropriation” at the end of the first sentence of paragraph (1).

28-5-122.
Publication of description of grant program by agency as prerequisite to making grants.

Before any state agency may make any grant of public funds or of funds otherwise within its power of disposition, the state agency must publish in print or electronically a description of the grant program in the Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia and the Secretary of State shall make such descriptions available for convenient public inspection.
The description must contain at least the following:

The name of the grant program;

The citation to the statutory basis for the grant program in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated or other general law of the State of Georgia;

The general scope and purpose of the grant program;

General terms and conditions of the grant;

Eligible recipients of the grant;

The criteria for the award of the grant; and

Directions and deadlines for applying for such grant.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-122

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 20; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

28-5-123.
Written application demonstrating eligibility as prerequisite to awarding of grant; award of grants to be determined independently by state agency.

No grant shall be awarded except upon written application which demonstrates in specific terms how the applicant is eligible and satisfies the criteria. All grants shall be disbursed pursuant to grant agreements which state in specific terms the amount and purposes of the grant and the other terms and conditions of the grant.

No grant by the executive branch of state government shall be awarded or disbursed solely upon the recommendation, request, or direction of an officer, member, or employee of the legislative or judicial branch of state government. The award and disbursement of any grant shall be determined independently by the state agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-123

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 20.

28-5-124.
State agencies to compile annual list of grants awarded and disbursed in prior fiscal year; register of lists to be maintained by Secretary of State.

Before December 31 of each calendar year, each state agency shall compile and file with the Secretary of State a list of grants awarded and disbursed in the prior fiscal year, reporting the recipient, grant program by name, specific purpose, and amount.
The Secretary of State shall maintain a register of such lists and make them available for convenient public inspection.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-124

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 20.

28-5-125.
Audits of recipients of grants.

Any recipient of a grant made by a state agency shall be subject to audit by the state auditor for the purpose of confirming compliance with state law and the performance of the terms of the grant.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-125

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 20.

28-5-126.
Grants in violation of article deemed void; effect of void grant on recipient.

Any grant made in violation of this article shall be void.
In addition to any other remedy provided by law, no recipient of a void grant shall be eligible for the award or disbursement of any other grant by a state agency until the full amount of the void grant is refunded to the state agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-126

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 20.

28-5-127.
Separate appropriation for grants in appropriations Acts; appropriation to contain word “grant.”

Any funding for grants in an appropriations Act by the General Assembly shall be separately appropriated, and the appropriation shall contain the word “grant” in its description of the purpose of the appropriation.
All appropriations for grants by a particular state agency shall be listed together under a heading that contains the word “grant” or “grants.”

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-127

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 20.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “ ‘grants.’ ” was substituted for “ ‘grants’.” at the end of this Code section.